Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1660.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin DIRECTION TO COMMISSIONER OF CHILDREN, YOUTH, AND FAMILIES; REPORT ON OUT-OF-SCHOOL AND YOUTH PROGRAMMING.new text end new text begin (a) The commissioner of children, youth, and families must evaluate statewide availability of out-of-school and youth programming that is available to youth 21 years of age and younger. The evaluation must include: new text end new text begin (1) data on current state, county, and city programs that offer enrichment activities, the funding for those activities, and the populations served by those activities; and new text end new text begin (2) a financial assessment that includes a complete list of state and local public programs and public financing mechanisms. new text end new text begin (b) The commissioner must utilize a community engagement process throughout the evaluation. The commissioner must engage with youth 21 years of age and younger, families with youth 21 years of age and younger, providers from city or county-based programs and community organizations, and subject-matter experts. The community engagement process must evaluate common barriers and gaps to accessing out-of-school and youth programming and must also provide recommendations on how to improve access to and the quality of out-of-school and youth programming. new text end new text begin (c) By February 15, 2026, the commissioner must provide a report to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over children, youth, and families. The report must include: new text end new text begin (1) the commissioner's findings from the evaluation and community engagement process; and new text end new text begin (2) finance and policy recommendations to expand access to quality out-of-school and youth programming for youth 21 years of age and younger. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin APPROPRIATION; REPORT ON OUT-OF-SCHOOL AND YOUTH PROGRAMMING.new text end new text begin $....... in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of children, youth, and families for the out-of-school and youth programming evaluation and report. This is a onetime appropriation. new text end